Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,105
Applicability of act.

The Title Insurers Act applies to all transactions entered into on or after September 13, 1997, except that:

(1) If the capital and surplus required prior to September 13, 1997, was less than that required by section 44-1985, a title insurer shall have two years after September 13, 1997, to comply with such section; and

(2) Section 44-1988 provides for a multiyear compliance period during which requisite reserves must be established.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 28.